Hawaii statutes.
§371K-3 General functions, duties, and
powers of the executive director. The executive director shall:

(1) Serve as the principal official in state
government responsible for the coordination of programs for the needy, poor,
and disadvantaged persons, refugees, and immigrants;

(2) Oversee, supervise, and direct the performance by
subordinates of activities in such areas as planning, evaluation, and
coordination of programs for disadvantaged persons, refugees, and immigrants
and development of a statewide service delivery network;

(3) Assess the policies and practices of public and
private agencies impacting on the disadvantaged and conduct advocacy efforts on
behalf of the disadvantaged, refugees, and immigrants;

(4) Devise and recommend legislative and
administrative actions for the improvement of services for the disadvantaged,
refugees, and immigrants;

(5) Serve as a member of advisory boards and panels
of state agencies in such areas as child development programs, elder programs,
social services programs, health and medical assistance programs, refugee
assistance programs, and immigrant services programs;

(6) Administer funds allocated for the office of
community services; and apply for, receive, and disburse grants and donations
from all sources for programs and services to assist the disadvantaged,
refugees, and immigrants;

(7) Adopt, amend, and repeal rules pursuant to
chapter 91 for purposes of this chapter;

(8) Retain such staff as may be necessary for the
purposes of this chapter, who may be exempt from chapter 76; and

(9) Contract for services as may be necessary for the
purposes of this chapter. [L 1985, c 305, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 67, §8; am L
2000, c 253, §150; am L 2006, c 300, §11; am L 2012, c 39, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next